src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON п_b/c~_олодой
+A:олод LF_end ;
+A:о́лод SF_c ;

LEXICON п_b/c~_орогой
+A:орог LF_end ;
+A:о́рог SF_c ;

LEXICON п_b/cs~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c'
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_плохой
+A:плох LF_end ;
+A:пло́х SF_c' ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred:ху́же # ;
+A+Cmpar+Pred+Att:ху́же%^P # ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_дурной
+A:н LF_end ;
+A:%^Fен SF_c' ;
+A:%^Fён SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_ст_щ
+A:ст LF_end ;
+A:ст SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЩЕ ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_т_ч
+A:т LF_end ;
+A:т SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_ЧЕ ;

LEXICON п_b/c'_сравн._затрудн.
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c' ;
+A: SF_comp_end_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c'~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c' ;

LEXICON п_b/c's~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c'_Prb ;

LEXICON п_b/c''
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_c'' ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b—
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF—_b ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b?
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b_Prb ;
+A: SF_comp_end ;

LEXICON п_b?~
+A: LF_end ;
+A: SF_b_Prb ;

LEXICON п_[мс_6a]ий
+A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +A+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Leng:%>ою # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +A+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
! +A+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ин
+A: мс_1a_Msc ;
+A: мс_1a_Neu ;
+A: мс_1a_Fem ;
+A: мс_1a_Pl ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Msc
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Neu
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;

LEXICON мс_1a_Fem
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Leng:%>ою # ;

! LEXICON мс_1a_Pl
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ын
п_[мс_1a]ин	;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ев
п_[мс_1a]ов ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1a]ов
+A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +A+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
+A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Leng:%>ою # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +A+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
! +A+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_a]нь
п_[мс_1a]ов ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1b]ин
+A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +A+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>а́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +A+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
+A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
! +A+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Leng:%>о́ю # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
! +A+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
! +A+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ы́х # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;

LEXICON п_[мс_1b]ов
+A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +A+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>а # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>е́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>у # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ы́м # ;
! +A+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы́ # ;
! +A+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы́ # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ы́х # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ы́х # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ы́м # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ы́ми # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ы # ;
! +A+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ы # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
! +A+MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON LF_stem
LF_stem_Nom ;
LF_stem_Acc ;
LF_stem_Gen ;
LF_stem_Loc ;
LF_stem_Dat ;
LF_stem_Ins ;

LEXICON LF_stem_Nom
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>ый # ;
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>ое # ;
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%>ая # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;

! LEXICON LF_stem_Acc
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:%>ый # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>ое # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%>ую # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ые # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON LF_stem_Gen
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ого # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%>ой # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON LF_stem_Loc
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ом # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%>ой # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;

! LEXICON LF_stem_Dat
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ому # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%>ой # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;

! LEXICON LF_stem_Ins
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ым # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%>ой # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Leng:%>ою # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON ABBR_LF_stem_hard ! with ordinal numbers ! TODO CHECK FIX figure out how these really work.
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%-й # ;
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%-е # ;
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom:%-я # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom:%-е # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:%-й # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%-го # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%-е # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc:%-ю # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%-е # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%-х # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%-го # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%-го # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen:%-й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen:%-х # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%-м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%-м # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc:%-й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc:%-х # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%-му # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%-му # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat:%-й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat:%-м # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%-м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%-м # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins:%-й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:%-ю # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins:%-ми # ;
! Facultative without the hyphen
+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac:й # ;
+Neu+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac:е # ;
+Fem+AnIn+Sg+Nom+Fac:я # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Nom+Fac:е # ;
! +Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc+Fac:й # ;
! +Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc+Fac:го # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Acc+Fac:е # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Acc+Fac:ю # ;
! +MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc+Fac:е # ;
! +MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc+Fac:х # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Gen+Fac:го # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Gen+Fac:го # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Gen+Fac:й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Gen+Fac:х # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Loc+Fac:м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Loc+Fac:м # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Loc+Fac:й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Loc+Fac:х # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Dat+Fac:му # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Dat+Fac:му # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Dat+Fac:й # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Dat+Fac:м # ;
! +Msc+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:м # ;
! +Neu+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:м # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac:й # ;
! +Fem+AnIn+Sg+Ins+Fac+Use/NG:ю # ;
! +MFN+AnIn+Pl+Ins+Fac:ми # ;
