src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
авгиев:а́вгиев п_[мс_1a]ев "weight: 2.304278135781231" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
гордиев:го́рдиев п_[мс_1a]ев "weight: 2.7565758067758614" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
израилев:изра́илев п_[мс_1a]ев "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ; ! RNC <мс 1a>
царёв:царёв п_[мс_1a]ев "weight: 2.8878547214151804" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
успеньев:успе́ньев п_[мс_1a]ев ; ! Z <мс 1a>
хозяйкин:хозя́йкин п_[мс_1a]ин "weight: 2.3712249254118443" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
дочкин:до́чкин п_[мс_1a]ин "weight: 2.6053081314452124" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
нянюшкин:ня́нюшкин п_[мс_1a]ин "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
ведьмин:ве́дьмин п_[мс_1a]ин "weight: 2.489914712743143" ; ! Znew <мс 1a>
мачехин:ма́чехин п_[мс_1a]ин "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
племянников:племя́нников п_[мс_1a]ов ; ! Z <мс 1a>
кумов:ку́мов п_[мс_1a]ов ; ! Z <мс 1a>
попов:попо́в п_[мс_1a]ов "weight: 1.6722549210758255" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
бертолетов:бертоле́тов п_[мс_1a]ов "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
племянницын:племя́нницын п_[мс_1a]ын ; ! Z <мс 1a>
троицын:тро́ицын п_[мс_1a]ын "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ; ! Z <мс 1a>
сестрицын:сестри́цын п_[мс_1a]ын ; ! Z <мс 1a>
курицын:ку́рицын п_[мс_1a]ын ; ! Z <мс 1a>
фомин:фоми́н п_[мс_1b]ин "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ; ! Z <мс 1b>
ильин:ильи́н п_[мс_1b]ин "weight: 2.0824293861648746" ; ! Z <мс 1b>
петров:петро́в п_[мс_1b]ов "weight: 2.4606253366411552" ; ! Z <мс, 1a// 1b>
господень:госпо́д%^Fень п_[мс_a]нь "weight: 3.9117331589959" ; ! Z <мс 2*a>
бродяжий:бродя́ж%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий "weight: 2.0032481401172504" ; ! Z <мс 6*a>
павлиний:павли́н%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий "weight: 2.848346180131507" ; ! Z <мс 6*a>
рачий:ра́ч%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий "weight: 2.1888847170791617" ; ! Z <мс 6*a>
исправничий:испра́внич%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий ; ! Z <мс 6*a>
цыплячий:цыпля́ч%^Fий п_[мс_6a]ий "weight: 2.746234973437643" ; ! Z <мс 6*a>
седой:се́д п_b/c' "weight: 4.385265182692118" ; ! Znew 1b/c'
удалой:уда́л п_b/c' "weight: 2.899038888367694" ; ! Z 1b/c'
дурной:ду́р%^Fен п_b/c' "weight: 4.510474142983451" ; ! Z 1*b/c' %tr% кф м ду/рен // дурён
скупой:ску́п п_b/c' "weight: 3.7519528768594808" ; ! Z 1b/c'
глухой:глу́х п_b/c' "weight: 4.529501239417337" ; ! Znew 3b/c'
густой:гу́ п_b/c'_ст_щ "weight: 4.556888476348604" ; ! Z 1b/c' %tr% сравн. гу/ще
лихой:ли́х п_b/c'_сравн._затрудн. "weight: 3.832766326421849" ; ! Znew 3b/c' сравн. затрудн.
крутой:кру́ п_b/c'_т_ч "weight: 4.606897632238309" ; ! Z 1b/c' %tr% сравн. кру/че
простой:про́ п_b/c'_ст_щ "weight: 5.420808399326999" ; ! Z 1b/c' %tr% сравн. про/ще
плохой: п_b/c'_плохой "weight: 5.172432565682346" ; ! Z 3b/c' %tr% сравн. ху/же
дрянной:дря́н%^Fён п_b/c'' "weight: 3.271201676979645" ; ! Z 1*b/c''
недурной:неду́р%^Fен п_b/c'~ "weight: 3.2487608079314" ; ! Z 1*b/c'~ %tr% кф м неду/рен // недурён
непростой:непро́ст п_b/c'~ "weight: 4.258681465249019" ; ! Z 1b/c'~
полупустой:полупу́ст п_b/c'~ "weight: 3.4226531028871428" ; ! Z 1b/c'~
неплохой:непло́х п_b/c'~ "weight: 4.566095912265048" ; ! Z 3b/c'~
полусухой:полусу́х п_b/c'~ "weight: 2.4182214880880677" ; ! Z 3b/c'~
неживой:нежи́в п_b/cs~ "weight: 3.6551719452855456" ; ! Z 1b/c%x%~
преблагой:пребла́г п_b/cs~ "weight: 1.9063381271091935" ; ! Z 3b/c%x%~
всеблагой:всебла́г п_b/cs~ "weight: 2.105910482014398" ; ! Z 3b/c%x%~
полусырой:полусы́р п_b/cs~ "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ; ! Z 1b/c%x%~
пресвятой:пресвя́т п_b/cs~ "weight: 3.5497908035953807" ; ! Z 1b/c%x%~
недорогой:нед п_b/c~_орогой "weight: 3.967035967462805" ; ! Z 3b/c~ %tr% кф см. дорого/й
немолодой:нем п_b/c~_олодой "weight: 3.696388600792545" ; ! Z 1b/c~ %tr% кф см. молодо/й
корневой:корне́в п_b? "weight: 3.383459381828856" ; ! Z 1b%[x]%
долговой:долго́в п_b? "weight: 3.314295256538755" ; ! Z 1b%[x]%
турбовинтовой:ту̀рбовинто́в п_b? "weight: 1.9411002333684055" ; ! Z 1b%[x]%
наводной:наво́дн п_b? ; ! Z 1b%[x]%
многолесной:мно̀голе́сн п_b? ; ! RNC 1b?
сватовской:свато́вск п_b?~ ; ! Z 3b%[x]%~
серпуховской:серпухо́вск п_b?~ "weight: 2.8685495662197935" ; ! Z 3b%[x]%~
оперативно-складской:оператѝвно-скла́дск п_b?~ ;
сумской:су́мск п_b?~ "weight: 2.6053081314452124" ; ! Z 3b%[x]%~
щегольской:щего́льск п_b?~ "weight: 2.5675195705558127" ; ! Z 3b%[x]%~
